trunk/apertium-swe-dan/dev/saldo/saldo.nouns.dix
<pardef n="b__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>b</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-et</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-t</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:et</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:t</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:n</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-n</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-na</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:na</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="småfransk/a__n_v">
  <e>       <p><l>an</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>at</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>or</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ana</l>       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orna</l>      <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="farbr/oder__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>oder</l>      <r>oder<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>odern</l>     <r>oder<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öder</l>      <r>oder<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öderna</l>    <r>oder<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="tum__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>men</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="medi/um__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>umet</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>umen</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ana</l>       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ena</l>       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
	</pardefs>

<e lm="kyrkobroder">     <i>kyrkobr</i><par n="farbr/oder__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="halvtum">         <i>halvtum</i><par n="tum__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="gillesbroder">    <i>gillesbr</i><par n="farbr/oder__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="gråbroder">       <i>gråbr</i><par n="farbr/oder__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="dryckesbroder">   <i>dryckesbr</i><par n="farbr/oder__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="smällglim">       <i>smällglim</i><par n="tum__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="formfranska">     <i>formfransk</i><par n="småfransk/a__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="vapenbroder">     <i>vapenbr</i><par n="farbr/oder__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="verktum">         <i>verktum</i><par n="tum__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="trätobroder">     <i>trätobr</i><par n="farbr/oder__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="långfranska">     <i>långfransk</i><par n="småfransk/a__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="tum">             <i>tum</i><par n="tum__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="olycksbroder">    <i>olycksbr</i><par n="farbr/oder__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="klosterbroder">   <i>klosterbr</i><par n="farbr/oder__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="svartbroder">     <i>svartbr</i><par n="farbr/oder__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="b">               <i>b</i><par n="b__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="lekmannabroder">  <i>lekmannabr</i><par n="farbr/oder__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="glim">            <i>glim</i><par n="tum__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="medium">          <i>medi</i><par n="medi/um__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="farbroder">       <i>farbr</i><par n="farbr/oder__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="medbroder">       <i>medbr</i><par n="farbr/oder__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="småfranska">      <i>småfransk</i><par n="småfransk/a__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="stallbroder">     <i>stallbr</i><par n="farbr/oder__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="nattglim">        <i>nattglim</i><par n="tum__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="halvbroder">      <i>halvbr</i><par n="farbr/oder__n_ut"/></e>
